tables/ko-2020-context.cti
always 싸옊 6-123-36-34-1-1
always 싸옋 6-123-36-34-1-3
always 싸옌 6-123-36-34-25
always 싸옍 6-123-36-34-25-13
always 싸옎 6-123-36-34-25-356
always 싸옏 6-123-36-34-35
always 싸옐 6-123-36-34-2
always 싸옑 6-123-36-34-2-1
always 싸옒 6-123-36-34-2-26
always 싸옓 6-123-36-34-2-12
always 싸옔 6-123-36-34-2-3
always 싸옕 6-123-36-34-2-236
always 싸옖 6-123-36-34-2-256
always 싸옗 6-123-36-34-2-356
always 싸옘 6-123-36-34-26
always 싸옙 6-123-36-34-12
always 싸옚 6-123-36-34-12-3
always 싸옛 6-123-36-34-3
always 싸옜 6-123-36-34-34
always 싸옝 6-123-36-34-2356
always 싸옞 6-123-36-34-13
always 싸옟 6-123-36-34-23
always 싸옠 6-123-36-34-235
always 싸옡 6-123-36-34-236
always 싸옢 6-123-36-34-256
always 싸옣 6-123-36-34-356
always 싸오 6-123-136
always 싸옥 6-123-1346
always 싸옦 6-123-1346-1
always 싸옧 6-123-1346-3
always 싸온 6-123-12356
always 싸옩 6-123-12356-13
always 싸옪 6-123-12356-356
always 싸옫 6-123-136-35
always 싸올 6-123-136-2
always 싸옭 6-123-136-2-1
always 싸옮 6-123-136-2-26
always 싸옯 6-123-136-2-12
always 싸옰 6-123-136-2-3
always 싸옱 6-123-136-2-236
always 싸옲 6-123-136-2-256
always 싸옳 6-123-136-2-356
always 싸옴 6-123-136-26
always 싸옵 6-123-136-12
always 싸옶 6-123-136-12-3
always 싸옷 6-123-136-3
always 싸옸 6-123-136-34
always 싸옹 6-123-123456
always 싸옺 6-123-136-13
always 싸옻 6-123-136-23
always 싸옼 6-123-136-235
always 싸옽 6-123-136-236
always 싸옾 6-123-136-256
always 싸옿 6-123-136-356
always 싸와 6-123-1236
always 싸왁 6-123-1236-1
always 싸왂 6-123-1236-1-1
always 싸왃 6-123-1236-1-3
always 싸완 6-123-1236-25
always 싸왅 6-123-1236-25-13
always 싸왆 6-123-1236-25-356
always 싸왇 6-123-1236-35
always 싸왈 6-123-1236-2
always 싸왉 6-123-1236-2-1
always 싸왊 6-123-1236-2-26
always 싸왋 6-123-1236-2-12
always 싸왌 6-123-1236-2-3
always 싸왍 6-123-1236-2-236
always 싸왎 6-123-1236-2-256
always 싸왏 6-123-1236-2-356
always 싸왐 6-123-1236-26
always 싸왑 6-123-1236-12
always 싸왒 6-123-1236-12-3
always 싸왓 6-123-1236-3
always 싸왔 6-123-1236-34
always 싸왕 6-123-1236-2356
always 싸왖 6-123-1236-13
always 싸왗 6-123-1236-23
always 싸왘 6-123-1236-235
always 싸왙 6-123-1236-236
always 싸왚 6-123-1236-256
always 싸왛 6-123-1236-356
always 싸왜 6-123-1236-1235
always 싸왝 6-123-1236-1235-1
always 싸왞 6-123-1236-1235-1-1
always 싸왟 6-123-1236-1235-1-3
always 싸왠 6-123-1236-1235-25
always 싸왡 6-123-1236-1235-25-13
always 싸왢 6-123-1236-1235-25-356
always 싸왣 6-123-1236-1235-35
always 싸왤 6-123-1236-1235-2
always 싸왥 6-123-1236-1235-2-1
always 싸왦 6-123-1236-1235-2-26
always 싸왧 6-123-1236-1235-2-12
always 싸왨 6-123-1236-1235-2-3
always 싸왩 6-123-1236-1235-2-236
always 싸왪 6-123-1236-1235-2-256
always 싸왫 6-123-1236-1235-2-356
always 싸왬 6-123-1236-1235-26
always 싸왭 6-123-1236-1235-12
always 싸왮 6-123-1236-1235-12-3
always 싸왯 6-123-1236-1235-3
always 싸왰 6-123-1236-1235-34
always 싸왱 6-123-1236-1235-2356
always 싸왲 6-123-1236-1235-13
always 싸왳 6-123-1236-1235-23
always 싸왴 6-123-1236-1235-235
always 싸왵 6-123-1236-1235-236
always 싸왶 6-123-1236-1235-256
always 싸왷 6-123-1236-1235-356
always 싸외 6-123-13456
always 싸왹 6-123-13456-1
always 싸왺 6-123-13456-1-1
always 싸왻 6-123-13456-1-3
always 싸왼 6-123-13456-25
always 싸왽 6-123-13456-25-13
always 싸왾 6-123-13456-25-356
always 싸왿 6-123-13456-35
always 싸욀 6-123-13456-2
always 싸욁 6-123-13456-2-1
always 싸욂 6-123-13456-2-26
always 싸욃 6-123-13456-2-12
always 싸욄 6-123-13456-2-3
always 싸욅 6-123-13456-2-236
always 싸욆 6-123-13456-2-256
always 싸욇 6-123-13456-2-356
always 싸욈 6-123-13456-26
always 싸욉 6-123-13456-12
always 싸욊 6-123-13456-12-3
always 싸욋 6-123-13456-3
always 싸욌 6-123-13456-34
always 싸욍 6-123-13456-2356
always 싸욎 6-123-13456-13
always 싸욏 6-123-13456-23
always 싸욐 6-123-13456-235
always 싸욑 6-123-13456-236
always 싸욒 6-123-13456-256
always 싸욓 6-123-13456-356
always 싸요 6-123-346
always 싸욕 6-123-346-1
always 싸욖 6-123-346-1-1
always 싸욗 6-123-346-1-3
always 싸욘 6-123-346-25
always 싸욙 6-123-346-25-13
always 싸욚 6-123-346-25-356
always 싸욛 6-123-346-35
always 싸욜 6-123-346-2
always 싸욝 6-123-346-2-1
always 싸욞 6-123-346-2-26
always 싸욟 6-123-346-2-12
always 싸욠 6-123-346-2-3
always 싸욡 6-123-346-2-236
always 싸욢 6-123-346-2-256
always 싸욣 6-123-346-2-356
always 싸욤 6-123-346-26
always 싸욥 6-123-346-12
always 싸욦 6-123-346-12-3
always 싸욧 6-123-346-3
always 싸욨 6-123-346-34
always 싸용 6-123-346-2356
always 싸욪 6-123-346-13
always 싸욫 6-123-346-23
always 싸욬 6-123-346-235
always 싸욭 6-123-346-236
always 싸욮 6-123-346-256
always 싸욯 6-123-346-356
always 싸우 6-123-134
always 싸욱 6-123-134-1
always 싸욲 6-123-134-1-1
always 싸욳 6-123-134-1-3
always 싸운 6-123-1245
always 싸욵 6-123-1245-13
always 싸욶 6-123-1245-356
always 싸욷 6-123-134-35
always 싸울 6-123-12346
always 싸욹 6-123-12346-1
always 싸욺 6-123-12346-26
always 싸욻 6-123-12346-12
always 싸욼 6-123-12346-3
always 싸욽 6-123-12346-236
always 싸욾 6-123-12346-256
always 싸욿 6-123-12346-356
always 싸움 6-123-134-26
always 싸웁 6-123-134-12
always 싸웂 6-123-134-12-3
always 싸웃 6-123-134-3
always 싸웄 6-123-134-34
always 싸웅 6-123-134-2356
always 싸웆 6-123-134-13
always 싸웇 6-123-134-23
always 싸웈 6-123-134-235
always 싸웉 6-123-134-236
always 싸웊 6-123-134-256
always 싸웋 6-123-134-356
always 싸워 6-123-1234
always 싸웍 6-123-1234-1
always 싸웎 6-123-1234-1-1
always 싸웏 6-123-1234-1-3
always 싸원 6-123-1234-25
always 싸웑 6-123-1234-25-13
always 싸웒 6-123-1234-25-356
always 싸웓 6-123-1234-35
always 싸월 6-123-1234-2
always 싸웕 6-123-1234-2-1
always 싸웖 6-123-1234-2-26
always 싸웗 6-123-1234-2-12
always 싸웘 6-123-1234-2-3
always 싸웙 6-123-1234-2-236
always 싸웚 6-123-1234-2-256
always 싸웛 6-123-1234-2-356
always 싸웜 6-123-1234-26
always 싸웝 6-123-1234-12
always 싸웞 6-123-1234-12-3
always 싸웟 6-123-1234-3
always 싸웠 6-123-1234-34
always 싸웡 6-123-1234-2356
always 싸웢 6-123-1234-13
always 싸웣 6-123-1234-23
always 싸웤 6-123-1234-235
always 싸웥 6-123-1234-236
always 싸웦 6-123-1234-256
always 싸웧 6-123-1234-356
always 싸웨 6-123-1234-1235
always 싸웩 6-123-1234-1235-1
always 싸웪 6-123-1234-1235-1-1
always 싸웫 6-123-1234-1235-1-3
always 싸웬 6-123-1234-1235-25
always 싸웭 6-123-1234-1235-25-13
always 싸웮 6-123-1234-1235-25-356
always 싸웯 6-123-1234-1235-35
always 싸웰 6-123-1234-1235-2
always 싸웱 6-123-1234-1235-2-1
always 싸웲 6-123-1234-1235-2-26
always 싸웳 6-123-1234-1235-2-12
always 싸웴 6-123-1234-1235-2-3
always 싸웵 6-123-1234-1235-2-236
always 싸웶 6-123-1234-1235-2-256
always 싸웷 6-123-1234-1235-2-356
always 싸웸 6-123-1234-1235-26
always 싸웹 6-123-1234-1235-12
always 싸웺 6-123-1234-1235-12-3
always 싸웻 6-123-1234-1235-3
always 싸웼 6-123-1234-1235-34
always 싸웽 6-123-1234-1235-2356
always 싸웾 6-123-1234-1235-13
always 싸웿 6-123-1234-1235-23
always 싸윀 6-123-1234-1235-235
always 싸윁 6-123-1234-1235-236
always 싸윂 6-123-1234-1235-256
always 싸윃 6-123-1234-1235-356
always 싸위 6-123-134-1235
always 싸윅 6-123-134-1235-1
always 싸윆 6-123-134-1235-1-1
always 싸윇 6-123-134-1235-1-3
always 싸윈 6-123-134-1235-25
always 싸윉 6-123-134-1235-25-13
always 싸윊 6-123-134-1235-25-356
always 싸윋 6-123-134-1235-35
always 싸윌 6-123-134-1235-2
always 싸윍 6-123-134-1235-2-1
always 싸윎 6-123-134-1235-2-26
always 싸윏 6-123-134-1235-2-12
always 싸윐 6-123-134-1235-2-3
always 싸윑 6-123-134-1235-2-236
always 싸윒 6-123-134-1235-2-256
always 싸윓 6-123-134-1235-2-356
always 싸윔 6-123-134-1235-26
always 싸윕 6-123-134-1235-12
always 싸윖 6-123-134-1235-12-3
always 싸윗 6-123-134-1235-3
always 싸윘 6-123-134-1235-34
always 싸윙 6-123-134-1235-2356
always 싸윚 6-123-134-1235-13
always 싸윛 6-123-134-1235-23
always 싸윜 6-123-134-1235-235
always 싸윝 6-123-134-1235-236
always 싸윞 6-123-134-1235-256
always 싸윟 6-123-134-1235-356
always 싸유 6-123-146
always 싸육 6-123-146-1
always 싸윢 6-123-146-1-1
always 싸윣 6-123-146-1-3
always 싸윤 6-123-146-25
always 싸윥 6-123-146-25-13
always 싸윦 6-123-146-25-356
always 싸윧 6-123-146-35
always 싸율 6-123-146-2
always 싸윩 6-123-146-2-1
always 싸윪 6-123-146-2-26
always 싸윫 6-123-146-2-12
always 싸윬 6-123-146-2-3
always 싸윭 6-123-146-2-236
always 싸윮 6-123-146-2-256
always 싸윯 6-123-146-2-356
always 싸윰 6-123-146-26
always 싸윱 6-123-146-12
always 싸윲 6-123-146-12-3
always 싸윳 6-123-146-3
always 싸윴 6-123-146-34
always 싸융 6-123-146-2356
always 싸윶 6-123-146-13
always 싸윷 6-123-146-23
always 싸윸 6-123-146-235
always 싸윹 6-123-146-236
always 싸윺 6-123-146-256
always 싸윻 6-123-146-356
always 싸으 6-123-246
always 싸윽 6-123-246-1
always 싸윾 6-123-246-1-1
always 싸윿 6-123-246-1-3
always 싸은 6-123-1356
always 싸읁 6-123-1356-13
always 싸읂 6-123-1356-356
always 싸읃 6-123-246-35
always 싸을 6-123-2346
always 싸읅 6-123-2346-1
always 싸읆 6-123-2346-26
always 싸읇 6-123-2346-12
always 싸읈 6-123-2346-3
always 싸읉 6-123-2346-236
always 싸읊 6-123-2346-256
always 싸읋 6-123-2346-356
always 싸음 6-123-246-26
always 싸읍 6-123-246-12
always 싸읎 6-123-246-12-3
always 싸읏 6-123-246-3
always 싸읐 6-123-246-34
always 싸응 6-123-246-2356
always 싸읒 6-123-246-13
always 싸읓 6-123-246-23
always 싸읔 6-123-246-235
always 싸읕 6-123-246-236
always 싸읖 6-123-246-256
always 싸읗 6-123-246-356
always 싸의 6-123-2456
always 싸읙 6-123-2456-1
always 싸읚 6-123-2456-1-1
always 싸읛 6-123-2456-1-3
always 싸읜 6-123-2456-25
always 싸읝 6-123-2456-25-13
always 싸읞 6-123-2456-25-356
always 싸읟 6-123-2456-35
always 싸읠 6-123-2456-2
always 싸읡 6-123-2456-2-1
always 싸읢 6-123-2456-2-26
always 싸읣 6-123-2456-2-12
always 싸읤 6-123-2456-2-3
always 싸읥 6-123-2456-2-236
always 싸읦 6-123-2456-2-256
always 싸읧 6-123-2456-2-356
always 싸읨 6-123-2456-26
always 싸읩 6-123-2456-12
always 싸읪 6-123-2456-12-3
always 싸읫 6-123-2456-3
always 싸읬 6-123-2456-34
always 싸읭 6-123-2456-2356
always 싸읮 6-123-2456-13
always 싸읯 6-123-2456-23
always 싸읰 6-123-2456-235
always 싸읱 6-123-2456-236
always 싸읲 6-123-2456-256
always 싸읳 6-123-2456-356
always 싸이 6-123-135
always 싸익 6-123-135-1
always 싸읶 6-123-135-1-1
always 싸읷 6-123-135-1-3
always 싸인 6-123-12345
always 싸읹 6-123-12345-13
always 싸읺 6-123-12345-356
always 싸읻 6-123-135-35
always 싸일 6-123-135-2
always 싸읽 6-123-135-2-1
always 싸읾 6-123-135-2-26
always 싸읿 6-123-135-2-12
always 싸잀 6-123-135-2-3
always 싸잁 6-123-135-2-236
always 싸잂 6-123-135-2-256
always 싸잃 6-123-135-2-356
always 싸임 6-123-135-26
always 싸입 6-123-135-12
always 싸잆 6-123-135-12-3
always 싸잇 6-123-135-3
always 싸있 6-123-135-34
always 싸잉 6-123-135-2356
always 싸잊 6-123-135-13
always 싸잋 6-123-135-23
always 싸잌 6-123-135-235
always 싸잍 6-123-135-236
always 싸잎 6-123-135-256
always 싸잏 6-123-135-356
always 쌔예 6-6-1235-36-34
always 쌔옉 6-6-1235-36-34-1
always 쌔옊 6-6-1235-36-34-1-1
always 쌔옋 6-6-1235-36-34-1-3
always 쌔옌 6-6-1235-36-34-25
always 쌔옍 6-6-1235-36-34-25-13
always 쌔옎 6-6-1235-36-34-25-356
always 쌔옏 6-6-1235-36-34-35
always 쌔옐 6-6-1235-36-34-2
always 쌔옑 6-6-1235-36-34-2-1
always 쌔옒 6-6-1235-36-34-2-26
always 쌔옓 6-6-1235-36-34-2-12
always 쌔옔 6-6-1235-36-34-2-3
always 쌔옕 6-6-1235-36-34-2-236
always 쌔옖 6-6-1235-36-34-2-256
always 쌔옗 6-6-1235-36-34-2-356
always 쌔옘 6-6-1235-36-34-26
always 쌔옙 6-6-1235-36-34-12
always 쌔옚 6-6-1235-36-34-12-3
always 쌔옛 6-6-1235-36-34-3
always 쌔옜 6-6-1235-36-34-34
always 쌔옝 6-6-1235-36-34-2356
always 쌔옞 6-6-1235-36-34-13
always 쌔옟 6-6-1235-36-34-23
always 쌔옠 6-6-1235-36-34-235
always 쌔옡 6-6-1235-36-34-236
always 쌔옢 6-6-1235-36-34-256
always 쌔옣 6-6-1235-36-34-356
always 쌰애 6-6-345-36-1235
always 쌰액 6-6-345-36-1235-1
always 쌰앢 6-6-345-36-1235-1-1
always 쌰앣 6-6-345-36-1235-1-3
always 쌰앤 6-6-345-36-1235-25
always 쌰앥 6-6-345-36-1235-25-13
always 쌰앦 6-6-345-36-1235-25-356
always 쌰앧 6-6-345-36-1235-35
always 쌰앨 6-6-345-36-1235-2
always 쌰앩 6-6-345-36-1235-2-1
always 쌰앪 6-6-345-36-1235-2-26
always 쌰앫 6-6-345-36-1235-2-12
always 쌰앬 6-6-345-36-1235-2-3
always 쌰앭 6-6-345-36-1235-2-236
always 쌰앮 6-6-345-36-1235-2-256
always 쌰앯 6-6-345-36-1235-2-356
always 쌰앰 6-6-345-36-1235-26
always 쌰앱 6-6-345-36-1235-12
always 쌰앲 6-6-345-36-1235-12-3
always 쌰앳 6-6-345-36-1235-3
always 쌰앴 6-6-345-36-1235-34
always 쌰앵 6-6-345-36-1235-2356
always 쌰앶 6-6-345-36-1235-13
always 쌰앷 6-6-345-36-1235-23
always 쌰앸 6-6-345-36-1235-235
always 쌰앹 6-6-345-36-1235-236
always 쌰앺 6-6-345-36-1235-256
always 쌰앻 6-6-345-36-1235-356
always 쌰예 6-6-345-36-34
always 쌰옉 6-6-345-36-34-1
always 쌰옊 6-6-345-36-34-1-1
always 쌰옋 6-6-345-36-34-1-3
always 쌰옌 6-6-345-36-34-25
always 쌰옍 6-6-345-36-34-25-13
always 쌰옎 6-6-345-36-34-25-356
always 쌰옏 6-6-345-36-34-35
always 쌰옐 6-6-345-36-34-2
always 쌰옑 6-6-345-36-34-2-1
always 쌰옒 6-6-345-36-34-2-26
always 쌰옓 6-6-345-36-34-2-12
always 쌰옔 6-6-345-36-34-2-3
